Utah statutes.
35A-8-603.   Creation of Pamela Atkinson Homeless Account.

(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "Pamela Atkinson Homeless Account."

(2)  Private contributions received under this section and Section 59-10-1306 shall be deposited into the restricted account to be used only for programs described in Section 35A-8-602.

(3)  Money shall be appropriated from the restricted account to the State Homeless Coordinating Committee in accordance with Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act.

(4)  The State Homeless Coordinating Committee may accept transfers, grants, gifts, bequests, or money made available from any source to implement this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

